District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.03

No agency power of member as member.

(a)

A member is not an agent of a limited cooperative association solely by reason of being a member.

(b)

A person’s status as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited cooperative association because of the person’s conduct.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(4)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 503 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.